Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202086-318
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund Act, the definitions found in sections 86-319 to 86-322 apply.

Laws 1997, LB 686, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 389, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,2001, § 86-1403;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 196;

Laws 2007, LB661, § 5;

Laws 2018, LB157, § 2.